District of Columbia statutes.
8-1310

Injunction.

If the Mayor finds that any person is operating a storage, treatment, or disposal facility, or is generating or transporting hazardous wastes in an illegal, unsafe, or otherwise improper manner that endangers the public health, the public welfare, or the environment, the Mayor may request the Corporation Counsel to commence appropriate civil action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to secure a temporary restraining order, a preliminary injunction, a permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 11, 24 DCR 6289
Aug. 10, 1984, D.C. Law 5-103, § 2(g), 31 DCR 3032
1981 Ed., § 6-710.
1973 Ed., § 6-530.